Maine, session 132, LD790.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24 MRSA §2908 is enacted to read:
§2908. Denial of patient access prohibited
A health care practitioner may not deny a patient access to health care services to be
performed by another health care practitioner when those services are within the lawful
scope of practice of the other health care practitioner.